hu_hu.affix
SFX Ţ Y 8 
SFX Ţ ö ővé ö
SFX Ţ ö ővel ö
SFX Ţ ö őhöz ö
SFX Ţ e évé e
SFX Ţ e ével e
SFX Ţ 0 vé [-áéiíóőuúüűy]
SFX Ţ 0 vel [-áéiíóőuúüűy]
SFX Ţ 0 höz [^aeoö]
SFX Ý Y 166 
SFX Ý ö őhöz ö
SFX Ý zs dzsé dzs
SFX Ý zs dzsel dzs
SFX Ý z szé [^s]sz
SFX Ý z szel [^s]sz
SFX Ý y tyé [^t]ty
SFX Ý y tyel [^t]ty
SFX Ý y nyé [^n]ny
SFX Ý y nyel [^n]ny
SFX Ý y lyé [^l]ly
SFX Ý y lyel [^l]ly
SFX Ý y gyé [^g]gy
SFX Ý y gyel [^g]gy
SFX Ý ty tyé tty
SFX Ý ty tyel tty
SFX Ý t té tt
SFX Ý t tel tt
SFX Ý sz szé ssz
SFX Ý sz szel ssz
SFX Ý s zsé [^d]zs
SFX Ý s zsel [^d]zs
SFX Ý s sé ss
SFX Ý s sel ss
SFX Ý s csé [^c]cs
SFX Ý s csel [^c]cs
SFX Ý r ré rr
SFX Ý r rel rr
SFX Ý p pé pp
SFX Ý p pel pp
SFX Ý ny nyé nny
SFX Ý ny nyel nny
SFX Ý n né nn
SFX Ý n nel nn
SFX Ý m mé mm
SFX Ý m mel mm
SFX Ý ly lyé lly
SFX Ý ly lyel lly
SFX Ý l lé ll
SFX Ý l lel ll
SFX Ý k ké kk
SFX Ý k kel kk
SFX Ý j jé jj
SFX Ý j jel jj
SFX Ý gy gyé ggy
SFX Ý gy gyel ggy
SFX Ý g gé gg
SFX Ý g gel gg
SFX Ý f fé ff
SFX Ý f fel ff
SFX Ý d dé dd
SFX Ý d del dd
SFX Ý cs csé ccs
SFX Ý cs csel ccs
SFX Ý c cé cc
SFX Ý c cel cc
SFX Ý b bé bb
SFX Ý b bel bb
SFX Ý 0 é GY-
SFX Ý 0 zé [^cts]z
SFX Ý 0 zé [^cts]Z-
SFX Ý 0 zsé ZS-
SFX Ý 0 zsel ZS-
SFX Ý 0 zel [^cts]z
SFX Ý 0 zel [^cts]Z-
SFX Ý 0 vé v
SFX Ý 0 vé [áeéuü]h
SFX Ý 0 vé V-
SFX Ý 0 vel v
SFX Ý 0 vel [áeéuü]h
SFX Ý 0 vel V-
SFX Ý 0 té th
SFX Ý 0 té [^t]t
SFX Ý 0 té T-
SFX Ý 0 tyé TY-
SFX Ý 0 tyel TY-
SFX Ý 0 tel th
SFX Ý 0 tel [^t]t
SFX Ý 0 tel T-
SFX Ý 0 sé sh
SFX Ý 0 sé [^tczs]s
SFX Ý 0 sé [^t]sch
SFX Ý 0 sé [^Z]S-
SFX Ý 0 szé x
SFX Ý 0 szé X-
SFX Ý 0 szé SZ-
SFX Ý 0 szel x
SFX Ý 0 szel X-
SFX Ý 0 szel SZ-
SFX Ý 0 sel sh
SFX Ý 0 sel [^tczs]s
SFX Ý 0 sel [^t]sch
SFX Ý 0 sel [^Z]S-
SFX Ý 0 ré [^r]r
SFX Ý 0 ré R-
SFX Ý 0 rel [^r]r
SFX Ý 0 rel R-
SFX Ý 0 pé [^p]p
SFX Ý 0 pé P-
SFX Ý 0 pel [^p]p
SFX Ý 0 pel P-
SFX Ý 0 né [^n]n
SFX Ý 0 né N-
SFX Ý 0 nyé NY-
SFX Ý 0 nyel NY-
SFX Ý 0 nel [^n]n
SFX Ý 0 nel N-
SFX Ý 0 mé [^m]m
SFX Ý 0 mé M-
SFX Ý 0 mel [^m]m
SFX Ý 0 mel M-
SFX Ý 0 lé [^l]l
SFX Ý 0 lé L-
SFX Ý 0 lyé LY-
SFX Ý 0 lyel LY-
SFX Ý 0 lel [^l]l
SFX Ý 0 lel L-
SFX Ý 0 ké [^k]k
SFX Ý 0 ké K-
SFX Ý 0 kel [^k]k
SFX Ý 0 kel K-
SFX Ý 0 jé [^j]j
SFX Ý 0 jé [^glnt]y
SFX Ý 0 jé J-
SFX Ý 0 jel [^j]j
SFX Ý 0 jel [^glnt]y
SFX Ý 0 jel J-
SFX Ý 0 höz [^aeoö]
SFX Ý 0 hé [^s]ch
SFX Ý 0 hé [^ctgsáeéuü]h
SFX Ý 0 hé H-
SFX Ý 0 hel [^s]ch
SFX Ý 0 hel [^ctgsáeéuü]h
SFX Ý 0 hel H-
SFX Ý 0 gé gh
SFX Ý 0 gé [^g]g
SFX Ý 0 gé G-
SFX Ý 0 gel gh
SFX Ý 0 gel [^g]g
SFX Ý 0 gel G-
SFX Ý 0 fé [^f]f
SFX Ý 0 fé F-
SFX Ý 0 fel [^f]f
SFX Ý 0 fel F-
SFX Ý 0 el GY-
SFX Ý 0 dé [^d]d
SFX Ý 0 dé D-
SFX Ý 0 dzsé DZS-
SFX Ý 0 dzsel DZS-
SFX Ý 0 del [^d]d
SFX Ý 0 del D-
SFX Ý 0 cé [ct]z
SFX Ý 0 cé [^c]c
SFX Ý 0 cé C-
SFX Ý 0 csé tsch
SFX Ý 0 csé ts
SFX Ý 0 csé CS-
SFX Ý 0 csel tsch
SFX Ý 0 csel ts
SFX Ý 0 csel CS-
SFX Ý 0 cel [ct]z
SFX Ý 0 cel [^c]c
SFX Ý 0 cel C-
SFX Ý 0 bé [^b]b
SFX Ý 0 bé B-
SFX Ý 0 bel [^b]b
SFX Ý 0 bel B-
SFX Ü Y 12 
SFX Ü z szerte [^s]sz
SFX Ü z szeri/ĐÓ×VLjcGR [^s]sz
SFX Ü z szeres/nÓ×BVLjcGTt [^s]sz
SFX Ü z szer [^s]sz
SFX Ü 0 szerte [^z]
SFX Ü 0 szerte [^s]z
SFX Ü 0 szeri/ĐÓ×VLjcGR [^z]
SFX Ü 0 szeri/ĐÓ×VLjcGR [^s]z
SFX Ü 0 szeres/nÓ×BVLjcGTt [^z]
SFX Ü 0 szeres/nÓ×BVLjcGTt [^s]z
SFX Ü 0 szer [^z]
SFX Ü 0 szer [^s]z
SFX Ű Y 12 
SFX Ű z szörös/ÝÔŘCWMjcHTt [^s]sz
SFX Ű z szörte [^s]sz
SFX Ű z szöri/ŢÔŘWMjcHR [^s]sz
SFX Ű z ször [^s]sz
SFX Ű 0 szörös/ÝÔŘCWMjcHTt [^z]
SFX Ű 0 szörös/ÝÔŘCWMjcHTt [^s]z
SFX Ű 0 szörte [^z]
SFX Ű 0 szörte [^s]z
SFX Ű 0 szöri/ŢÔŘWMjcHR [^z]
SFX Ű 0 szöri/ŢÔŘWMjcHR [^s]z
SFX Ű 0 ször [^z]
SFX Ű 0 ször [^s]z
SFX Ú Y 12 
SFX Ú z szorta [^s]sz
SFX Ú z szoros/mŇÖAUKicFSs [^s]sz
SFX Ú z szori/ĎŇÖUKicFQ [^s]sz
SFX Ú z szor [^s]sz
SFX Ú 0 szorta [^z]
SFX Ú 0 szorta [^s]z
SFX Ú 0 szoros/mŇÖAUKicFSs [^z]
SFX Ú 0 szoros/mŇÖAUKicFSs [^s]z
SFX Ú 0 szori/ĎŇÖUKicFQ [^z]
SFX Ú 0 szori/ĎŇÖUKicFQ [^s]z
SFX Ú 0 szor [^z]
SFX Ú 0 szor [^s]z

SFX Ů Y 1 
SFX Ů 0 at [^aáeéiíoóöőuúüű]
SFX Ř Y 22 
SFX Ř ö őt ö
SFX Ř 0 öt tsch
SFX Ř 0 öt gy
SFX Ř 0 öt cs
SFX Ř 0 öt [knsprty]s
SFX Ř 0 öt [cjrt]z
SFX Ř 0 öt [bknprs]sz
SFX Ř 0 öt [^s]ch
SFX Ř 0 öt [^aáeéiíóöőuúüűcs][hj]
SFX Ř 0 öt [^aáeéiíoóöőuúüűjlnrsyz]
SFX Ř 0 öt [^aáeéiíoóöőuúüű]zs
SFX Ř 0 öt [^aáeéiíoóöőuúüű][^g]y
SFX Ř 0 t sh
SFX Ř 0 t [áéiíóöőuúüűlnrx]
SFX Ř 0 t [aáeéiíóöőuúüű]j
SFX Ř 0 t [aáeéiíoóöőuúüű]zs
SFX Ř 0 t [aáeéiíoóöőuúüű][^g]y
SFX Ř 0 t [^t]sch
SFX Ř 0 t [^ckprtz]s
SFX Ř 0 t [^cjrst]z
SFX Ř 0 t [^bkp]sz
SFX Ř 0 t -
SFX × Y 27 
SFX × e ét [^ae]e
SFX × 0 t sh
SFX × 0 t [áéiíóöőuúüűlnrx]
SFX × 0 t [aáeéiíóöőuúüű]j
SFX × 0 t [aáeéiíoóöőuúüű]zs
SFX × 0 t [aáeéiíoóöőuúüű][^g]y
SFX × 0 t [ae]e
SFX × 0 t [^t]sch
SFX × 0 t [^ckprtz]s
SFX × 0 t [^cjrst]z
SFX × 0 t [^bkp]sz
SFX × 0 et ötven
SFX × 0 et tsch
SFX × 0 et negyven
SFX × 0 et kilencven
SFX × 0 et hetven
SFX × 0 et gy
SFX × 0 et cs
SFX × 0 et [knsprty]s
SFX × 0 et [cjrt]z
SFX × 0 et [bknprs]sz
SFX × 0 et [^s]ch
SFX × 0 et [^aáeéiíóöőuúüűcs][hj]
SFX × 0 et [^aáeéiíoóöőuúüűjlnrsyz]
SFX × 0 et [^aáeéiíoóöőuúüű]zs
SFX × 0 et [^aáeéiíoóöőuúüű][^g]y
SFX × 0 et -
SFX Ö Y 21 
SFX Ö 0 t sh
SFX Ö 0 t [áéiíóöőuúüűlnrx]
SFX Ö 0 t [aáeéiíóöőuúüű]j
SFX Ö 0 t [aáeéiíoóöőuúüű]zs
SFX Ö 0 t [aáeéiíoóöőuúüű][^g]y
SFX Ö 0 t [^t]sch
SFX Ö 0 t [^crst]z
SFX Ö 0 t [^ckprtz]s
SFX Ö 0 t [^bkp]sz
SFX Ö 0 ot tsch
SFX Ö 0 ot gy
SFX Ö 0 ot cs
SFX Ö 0 ot [knsprty]s
SFX Ö 0 ot [cjrt]z
SFX Ö 0 ot [bknprs]sz
SFX Ö 0 ot [^s]ch
SFX Ö 0 ot [^aáeéiíóöőuúüűcs][hj]
SFX Ö 0 ot [^aáeéiíoóöőuúüűjlnrsyz]
SFX Ö 0 ot [^aáeéiíoóöőuúüű]zs
SFX Ö 0 ot [^aáeéiíoóöőuúüű][^g]y
SFX Ö 0 ot -

SFX Ő Y 6 
SFX Ő ö őt ö
SFX Ő o ót [^o]o
SFX Ő e ét e
SFX Ő a át a
SFX Ő 0 t oo
SFX Ő 0 t [áéiíóőuúüűhy-]

SFX Ô Y 3 
SFX Ô ö őn ö
SFX Ô 0 ön [^aáeéiíóőuúüű]
SFX Ô 0 n [áéiíóőuúüű]

SFX Ó Y 4 
SFX Ó e én [^ae]e
SFX Ó 0 n [áéiíóőuúüű]
SFX Ó 0 n [ae]e
SFX Ó 0 en [^aáeéiíóőuúüű]

SFX Ň Y 5 
SFX Ň o ón [^o]o
SFX Ň a án a
SFX Ň 0 on [^aáeéiíoóőuúüű]
SFX Ň 0 n oo
SFX Ň 0 n [áéiíóőuúüű]

SFX Ń Y 1 
SFX Ń 0 n [y-]
SFX Đ Y 11 
SFX Đ ö ővé ö
SFX Đ ö ővel ö
SFX Đ e évé [^ae]e
SFX Đ e ével [^ae]e
SFX Đ e éhez [^ae]e
SFX Đ 0 vé [ae]e
SFX Đ 0 vé [-áéiíóőuúüűy]
SFX Đ 0 vel [ae]e
SFX Đ 0 vel [-áéiíóőuúüűy]
SFX Đ 0 hez [ae]e
SFX Đ 0 hez [^aeoö]
SFX Ď Y 12 
SFX Ď o óvá [^o]o
SFX Ď o óval [^o]o
SFX Ď o óhoz [^o]o
SFX Ď a ává a
SFX Ď a ával a
SFX Ď a ához a
SFX Ď 0 vá oo
SFX Ď 0 vá [-áéiíóőuúüűy]
SFX Ď 0 val oo
SFX Ď 0 val [-áéiíóőuúüűy]
SFX Ď 0 hoz oo
SFX Ď 0 hoz [^aeoö]
SFX Î Y 10 
SFX Î o ócskás/mŇÖUiFSsx!" [^o]o
SFX Î o ócska/AUKicĎŇÖQY@ [^o]o
SFX Î a ácskás/mŇÖUiFSsx!" a
SFX Î a ácska/AUKicĎŇÖQY@ a
SFX Î 0 cskás/mŇÖUiFSsx!" oo
SFX Î 0 cskás/mŇÖUiFSsx!" [áéiíóöőuúüű-]
SFX Î 0 cska/AUKicĎŇÖQY@ oo
SFX Î 0 cska/AUKicĎŇÖQY@ [áéiíóöőuúüű-]
SFX Î 0 acskás/mŇÖUiFSsx!" [^aáeéiíoóöőuúüű]
SFX Î 0 acska/AUKicĎŇÖQY@ [^aáeéiíoóöőuúüű]

SFX Í Y 8 
SFX Í ök öcskés/nÓ×VjGTtx!" ök
SFX Í ök öcske/BVLjcĐÓ×RY@ ök
SFX Í ok ocskás/mŇÖUiFSsx!" ok
SFX Í ok ocska/AUKicĎŇÖQY@ ok
SFX Í ek ecskés/nÓ×VjGTtx!" ek
SFX Í ek ecske/BVLjcĐÓ×RY@ ek
SFX Í ak acskás/mŇÖUiFSsx!" ak
SFX Í ak acska/AUKicĎŇÖQY@ ak

SFX Ě Y 6 
SFX Ě ö őcskés/nÓ×VjGTtx!" ö
SFX Ě ö őcske/BVLjcĐÓ×RY@ ö
SFX Ě 0 öcskés/nÓ×VjGTtx!" [^aáeéiíoóöőuúüű]
SFX Ě 0 öcske/BVLjcĐÓ×RY@ [^aáeéiíoóöőuúüű]
SFX Ě 0 cskés/nÓ×VjGTtx!" [áéiíoóőuúüű-]
SFX Ě 0 cske/BVLjcĐÓ×RY@ [áéiíoóőuúüű-]

SFX Ë Y 8 
SFX Ë e écskés/nÓ×VjGTtx!" [^ae]e
SFX Ë e écske/BVLjcĐÓ×RY@ [^ae]e
SFX Ë 0 ecskés/nÓ×VjGTtx!" [^aáeéiíoóöőuúüű]
SFX Ë 0 ecske/BVLjcĐÓ×RY@ [^aáeéiíoóöőuúüű]
SFX Ë 0 cskés/nÓ×VjGTtx!" [áéiíoóőuúüű-]
SFX Ë 0 cskés/nÓ×VjGTtx!" [ae]e
SFX Ë 0 cske/BVLjcĐÓ×RY@ [áéiíoóőuúüű-]
SFX Ë 0 cske/BVLjcĐÓ×RY@ [ae]e
SFX Ę Y 10 
SFX Ę o ócskás/mŇÖUiFSsx!" [^o]o
SFX Ę o ócska/AUKicĎŇÖQY@ [^o]o
SFX Ę a ácskás/mŇÖUiFSsx!" a
SFX Ę a ácska/AUKicĎŇÖQY@ a
SFX Ę 0 ocskás/mŇÖUiFSsx!" [^aáeéiíoóöőuúüű]
SFX Ę 0 ocska/AUKicĎŇÖQY@ [^aáeéiíoóöőuúüű]
SFX Ę 0 cskás/mŇÖUiFSsx!" oo
SFX Ę 0 cskás/mŇÖUiFSsx!" [áéiíóöőuúüű-]
SFX Ę 0 cska/AUKicĎŇÖQY@ oo
SFX Ę 0 cska/AUKicĎŇÖQY@ [áéiíóöőuúüű-]
