hu_hu.dict
ötvenezred/BVÜb)
öt/ÝWŰMRbhcÔŘma	
vízgyűjtőgödör/WÝyjYcŻ	
vu-/MWÔŘÝRTtj)
videoszűrő/ŐCWRĚŻjŢÔíyČÁ˙Yc˝
vezérlés/XVËŻj×LnÓéčłÄäTtYc¸źl
valószínűségeloszlás/UĘŽiÖKmŇáç˛ĂăSsYcˇťk
több/×nÔBDLVR)
tizenöttrillió/ĎŇŐAUÚQbci	
tizenkilencezred/BVÜb)
tizenkettő/ŢWŰMRbhc	
teljesszög/WĚŻjŘMÝÔíčłĹĺTtYc¸˝l
telefon/UĘŽiÖKmŇáç˛ĂăQYcˇťk
tavi/AFUxĎŐŇ)
szünfenobiológus/UĘŽiÖKmŇáyÇżßSsYcť
szövetlenség/XVËŻj×LnÓéčłÄäTtYc¸źl)
szömörcsög/WĚŻjŘMÝÔíčłĹĺRYc¸˝l
sztereofilm/VËŻj×LnÓéčłÄäRYc¸źl
szolubilitás/UĘŽiÖKmŇáç˛ĂăSsYcˇťk
szintvonaljelzés/VËŻj×LnÓéyČŔŕTtYcź
szeszmérő/ŐCWRĚŻjŢÔíyČÁ˙Yc˝
szegélykő/WŢŘÔyjYcČ	
sprotni/ŐAUQĘŽiĎŇáç˛ĂăYcˇť
pirogránit/UĘŽiÖKmŇáyÇżßQYcť
perlő/ŐCWRĚŻjŢÔíčłĹĺYc¸˝X)
pedigré/ŐBVRËŻjĐÓéčłÄäYc¸ź
olló/ŐAUQĘŽiĎŇáç˛ĂăYcˇť
nótáskönyv/WĚŻjŘMÝÔíčłĹĺTtYc¸˝l
négyszáz/$UŮÖmŇSscÚ	
négyheti/ŐBVRËŻjĐÓéčłÄäYc¸ź
nyolcvannégy/nVÜLlTtbhc
nyolcvankettő/ŢWŰMRbhc
nyolcezredik/nÓ×BVÜb)
nulla/AŇŐĎUKkQÚ	
negyvenkettő/ŢWŰMRbhc
napfényképező/ŐCWRĚŻjŢÔíyČÁ˙Yc˝
nagyapa/ŐAUĘŽiĎŇáyÇżßYcť	
méhűr/WĚŻjŘMÝÔíyČÁ˙RYc˝
monopolszervezet/VËŻj×LnÓéyČŔŕTtYcź
mettőr/WĚŻjŘMÝÔíčłĹĺRYc¸˝l
madeirahímzés/VËŻj×LnÓéčłÄäTtYc¸źl
lópikula/ŐAUQĘŽiĎŇáyÇżßYcť
légzés/XVËŻj×LnÓéčłÄäTtYc¸źl)
leszállítás/UĘŽiÖKmŇáç˛ĂăSsYcˇťk
közöny/WĚŻjŘMÝÔíčłĹĺTtYc¸˝l
kézibeszélő/ŐCWRĚŻjŢÔíyČÁ˙Yc˝
készfizető/ŐCWRĚŻjŢÔíyČÁ˙Yc˝
kérkedő/ŐCWRĚŻjŢÔíčłĹĺYc¸˝
kvintilliárd/AUÖmŇKkQcˇĂżçÚ
kooptálás/UĘŽiÖKmŇáç˛ĂăSsYcˇťk
kiserőd/WĚŻjŘMÝÔíyČÁ˙RYc˝
kilencvenkilenc/nVÜLlTtbhc
kilencvenkettő/ŢWŰMRbhc
kettőszáz/$UŮÖmŇSsÚ	
júdásfa/ŐAUQĘŽiĎŇáç˛ĂăYcˇť
incselgés/XVËŻj×LnÓéčłÄäTtYc¸źl)
hárászkendő/ŐCWRĚŻjŢÔíyČÁ˙Yc˝
háládatosság/UĘŽiÖKmŇáç˛ĂăSsYcˇťk
huszonöt/ÝWŰMRbhc	
huszonhét/nVÜbhc	
huszonhattrillió/ĎŇŐAUÚQbci	
hatvanöt/ÝWŰMRbhc
hatvannégymillió/ĎŇŐAUÚQbcj	
hatvankilencezredik/nÓ×BVÜb)
hatodféltrillió/AUŐĎŇKQxcˇĂżÇ
harmincnyolcmillió/ĎŇŐAUÚQbcj	
harmincegy/nVÜLlbhc	
görögszéna/ŐAUQĘŽiĎŇáyÇżßYcť
gyomorkeserű/ŐCWRĚŻjŢÔíčłĹĺYc¸˝
grépfrút/UĘŽiÖKmŇáç˛ĂăQYcˇťk
gondolatátvitel/VËŻj×LnÓéyČŔŕTtYcź
gazemberség/VËŻj×LnÓéyČŔŕTtYcź
fúvócső/WŢŘÔyjYcČ	
filmfelvevő/ŐCWRĚŻjŢÔíyČÁ˙Yc˝
eszköz/WĚŻjŘMÝÔíčłĹĺTtYc¸˝l
emprimé/ŐBVRËŻjĐÓéčłÄäYc¸ź
elvbarát/UĘŽiÖKmŇáç˛ĂăQYcˇťk
eljárásmód/UĘŽiÖKmŇáyÇżßQYcť
díler/VËŻj×LnÓéčłÄäRTtYc¸źl
disznóbőr/WĚŻjŘMÝÔíyČÁ˙RTtYc˝
dependencia/ŐAUQĘŽiĎŇáç˛ĂăYcˇť
cölöp/WĚŻjŘMÝÔíčłĹĺRYc¸˝l
cirbolyafenyő/ŐCWRĚŻjŢÔíčłĹĺYc¸˝
busás/UĘŽiÖKmŇáç˛ĂăSsYcˇťk
barbecue-s/ŇŮmAFUKQx)	ph:barbekjús
bambino/ŐAUQĘŽiĎŇáç˛ĂăYcˇť
arámi/ŐBVRËŻjĐÓéčłÄäc¸ź
akaratnélküliség/VËŻj×LnÓéyČŔŕTtYcź
afgán/UĘŽiÖKmŇáç˛ĂăQcˇťk
vigalmak/IóÍžJĆćş´x)
szurokszenek/IóÍžĆćşx)
padlófénymázak/IóÍžĆćşx)
lódarazsak/IóÍžĆćşx)
keresetlevelek/IóÍžĆćşx)
hajfodrok/IóÍžJĆćş´x)
becsületszavak/IóÍžĆćşx)
áttörő/ąCÔŐŢHWĚR
vörösfejű/ąCÔŐŢHWĚR
visszahozhatatlan/ŇŮmFUÎKÖQk°
vaskezű/ąCÔŐŢHWĚR
vadízű/ąCÔŐŢHWĚR
tökkelütött/Ô×ÝGVĚNRlą
táplálatlan/ŇŮmFUÎKÖQk°
taknyos/ŇŮmFUÎKÖSsk°
szárnyaszegett/Ó×nGVËLRlą
szakszervezeti/ąBÓŐĐGVËR
skrupulózus/ŇŮmFUÎKÖSsk°
sivár/ŇŮmFUÎKÖQk°
pisilhatatlan/ŇŮmFUÎKÖQkX)
piknikus/ŇŮmFUÎKÖSsk°
olaszos/ŇŮmFUÎKÖSsk°
meglevő/ąCÔŐŢHWĚR
megismétlő/ąCÔŐŢHWĚR
láncolt/ŇŮmFUÎQk°
logaritmikus/ŇŮmFUÎKÖSsk°
lekicsinylő/ąCÔŐŢHWĚR
körülmetéletlen/Ó×nGVËLRlą
kontemplatív/ŇŮmFUÎKÖSsk°
kalcinált/ŇŮmFUÎQk°
hűtlen/Ó×nGVËLRlą
hígfolyós/ŇŮmFUÎKÖSsk°
hathavonkénti/ąBÓŐĐGVËR
főtt/Ô×ÝGVĚNRą)
főtt/Ô×ÝGVĚNRą
féregrágta/°AŇŐĎFUÎQ
felüdítetlen/Ó×nGVËLRlą
evangélikus/ŇŮmFUÎKÖSsk°
elnagyolt/ŇŮmFUÎQk°
bőtermő/ąCÔŐŢHWĚR
automata/°AŇŐĎFUÎQ
atmoszferikus/ŇŮmFUÎKÖSsk°
Zsasskovszky/UĘŽiŐAĎŃqÇżßQ,ˇk
Warou/ŐAUQĘŽiĎŇqÇżß,ˇ
Városlőd/WĚŻjŘMÝÔqśR,¸l
Vinkovits/UĘŽiÖKmŇqÇżßSs,ˇk	
Vilyvitány/UĘŽiÖKmŇqľSs,ˇk
Verne/ŐBVRËŻjĐÓqČŔŕ,¸
Tengeri/ŐBVRËŻjĐÓqś,¸
Sztrókay/UĘŽiŐAĎŃqÇżßQ,ˇk
Révfülöp/WĚŻjŘMÝÔqśR,¸l
Péterfi/ŐBVRËŻjĐÓqČŔŕ,¸
Pándy/UĘŽiŐAĎŃqÇżßQ,ˇ
PIN-/LVÓ×nRTtj)
Neményi/ŐBVRËŻjĐÓqČŔŕ,¸
Moha/ŐAUQĘŽiĎŇqľ,ˇ
Martinszky/VËŻjŐBĐŃqČŔŕR,¸l
Kővágószőlős/WĚŻjŘMÝÔqśTt,¸l
Korinthosz/UĘŽiÖKmŇqľSs,ˇk
Klösz/WĚŻjŘMÝÔqČÁ˙Tt,¸
Karcsa/ŐAUQĘŽiĎŇqľ,ˇ
Kakujay/UĘŽiŐAĎŃqÇżßQ,ˇk
IrDA-s/ŇŮmAFUKQ)
Fáskerthy/VËŻjŐBĐŃqČŔŕR,¸l
Folly/UĘŽiŐAĎŃqÇżßQ,ˇ
Fidzsi/ŐBVRËŻjĐÓqś,¸
Cincinnati/ŐBVRËŻjĐÓqś,¸
Btk.-i/ŃĎŐAFUKSs)
Baradlai/ŐBVRËŻjĐÓqČŔŕ,¸
Angelika/ŐAUQĘŽiĎŇqÇżß,ˇ
APM-es/Ó×nBGVLR)
5-/1ŰuMWÔŘÝRTtj)
&Nu;-/CWRŢŃŐj)
